Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.121

Candidates' statements—Length. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by candidates is as follows: State representative, one hundred words; state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred words; president and vice president, United States senator, United States representative, and governor, three hundred words.

(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not exceed two hundred fifty words in length.

(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed seventy-five words in length.

(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

[ 2004 c 271 s 168.]

PDFRCW 29A.32.121

Candidates' statements—Length. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by candidates is as follows: State representative, 100 words; state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon throughout the state, except that of governor, 200 words; president and vice president, United States senator, United States representative, and governor, 300 words.

(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not exceed 250 words in length.

(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed 75 words in length.

(4) The secretary of state or county auditor shall allocate space in the pamphlet based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

[ 2024 c 78 s 6; 2004 c 271 s 168.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.